North Dakota, session 69, SB2399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 50-24.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Reimbursement of psychiatric residential treatment facilities.
The department shall amend the rules for medical assistance reimbursement of psychiatric
residential treatment facilities for direct care costs, including the applicable costs related to clinical
supervisors, medical directors, engagement of families in care, therapeutic leave days, and an
administrative costs cap. Reimbursements for therapeutic leave days may not exceed five hundred
dollars per day. The department shall implement utilization controls, including service authorization for
therapeutic leave days.
SECTION 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
REIMBURSEMENT - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT. The department shall submit a report
to the legislative management by October 1, 2026, regarding changes to medical assistance
reimbursement of psychiatric residential treatment facilities for direct care costs, including the
applicable costs related to clinical supervisions, medical directors, engagement of families in care,
therapeutic leave days, and an administrative cost cap and progress towards value-based care.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES-PSYCHIATRIC RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $647,149, or so much of the
sum as may be necessary, and from other funds derived from federal and special funds, the sum of
$660,025, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of health and human
services for the purpose of psychiatric residential treatment facility reimbursement, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2399 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2399.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State